Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.200

Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of art—Expenditure by arts commission—Conditions.

(1) All state agencies including all state departments, boards, councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) For projects funded in the capital budget, a state agency, working with the Washington state arts commission, may expend up to ten percent of the projected art allocation for a project during the design phase in order to select an artist and design art to be integrated in the building design. The one-half of one percent to be expended by the Washington state arts commission must be adjusted downward by the amount expended by a state agency during the design phase of the capital project.

(3) The works of art may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.

(4) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include highway construction sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.

[ 2019 c 240 s 2; 2018 c 298 s 7016; 2005 c 36 s 4; 1983 c 204 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 298: See note following RCW 79.17.210.

Severability—1983 c 204: See note following RCW 43.46.090.

Acquisition of works of art for public buildings and lands—Visual arts program established: RCW 43.46.090.

Purchase of works of art

interagency reimbursement for expenditure by visual arts program: RCW 43.17.205.

procedure: RCW 43.19.455.

State art collection: RCW 43.46.095.